Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9. Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5724
Place of employment, defined.

Place of employment means an indoor area under the control of a proprietor that an employee accesses as part of his or her employment without regard to whether the employee is present or work is occurring at any given time. The indoor area includes, but is not limited to, any work area, employee breakroom, restroom, conference room, meeting room, classroom, employee cafeteria, and hallway. A private residence is a place of employment when such residence is being used as a licensed child care program and one or more children who are not occupants of such residence are present.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 9.
June 1, 2009